Hawaii statutes.
§576B-709 Partial enforcement. If a
tribunal of this State does not recognize and enforce a Convention support
order in its entirety, it shall enforce any severable part of the order. An
application or direct request may seek recognition and partial enforcement of a
Convention support order. [L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next